Utah statutes.
19-6-604.   Disposal by battery retailer.
(1)  A lead acid battery retailer may not dispose of a used lead acid battery
except by delivery to:
(a)  a lead acid battery wholesaler;
(b)  a lead acid battery manufacturer for delivery to a secondary lead smelter
that meets state and federal permit requirements;
(c)  a collection or recycling facility; or
(d)  a secondary lead smelter that meets state and federal permit
requirements.
(2)  Removal or disposal of acid or other contents from lead acid batteries
shall be done only in accordance with board rules.
(3)  A lead acid battery retailer shall ensure removal of lead acid batteries
received under Section 19-6-602 or 19-6-603 from the retail collection point.
